Arkansas, session 2025, SB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-64-718, concerning preservation of Pine
Tree Research Station, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as
follows:
(e)(1) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas shall not
commercially harvest timber on the property commonly known as the “Pine Tree
Research Station”, located in St. Francis County, Arkansas, acquired by the
Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas from the United States of
America, acting through the United States Forest Service in 1978.
(2)(A) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas may
manage the timber for wildlife management purposes on the property commonly
known as the “Pine Tree Research Station”, located in St. Francis County,
Arkansas, acquired by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas
from the United States of America, acting through the United States Forest
Service in 1978.
(B) The Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas
shall submit to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
*CRH003*
01/17/2025 11:31:25 AM CRH003

SB85
Development and the House Committee on Agriculture, Forestry, and Economic
Development for prior review a contract initiated by the Board of Trustees of
the University of Arkansas, its assigns, or any state entity to manage the
timber for wildlife management purposes, including without limitation through
timber harvesting or logging, as permitted under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of
this section.






























01/17/2025 11:31:25 AM CRH003